Utah statutes.
77-28b-8.   Referral to the United States Department of Justice, Office of International Affairs.

(1)  Upon receipt of the governor's authorization for international transfer, the application and materials shall be forwarded to the United States Department of Justice, Office of International Affairs, by the Inmate Placement Program Bureau.

(2)  The bureau shall notify the inmate and the warden of the sending institution of the decision of the application for international transfer.

(3)  All arrangements regarding the treaty process and proposed assurances shall be negotiated between the bureau and the United States Department of Justice, Office of International Affairs.



Enacted by Chapter 324, 1990 General Session

